Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.120.040

Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account.

The Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program account is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The student achievement council shall deposit in the fund all moneys received for the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of awarding grants under the Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program. Disbursements from the fund shall be on the authorization of the student achievement council. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for disbursements.

[ 2022 c 244 s 2; 2012 c 229 s 575; 1999 c 169 s 7; 1996 c 41 s 3; 1991 c 98 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.